Utah statutes.
73-10-19.   Director's power and authority.
The director shall be the executive and administrative head of the Division of
Water Resources and shall be a person selected with special reference to his
training, experience and interest in the field of water conservation and
development.
The director of the Division of Water Resources shall administer the Division
of Water Resources and shall succeed to all of the powers and duties conferred
upon the executive secretary of the Utah water and power board pursuant to
Title 73, Chapter 10.  The director shall have the power within policies
established by the Board of Water Resources to:
(1)  make studies, investigations, and plans for the full development and
utilization and promotion of the water and power resources of the state,
including preliminary surveys, stream gauging, examinations, tests, and other
estimates either separately or in consultation with federal, state and other
agencies;
(2)  initiate and conduct water resource investigations, surveys and studies,
prepare plans and estimates, make reports thereon, and perform necessary work
to develop an over-all state water plan;
(3)  file applications in the name of the division for the appropriation of
water.  All pending water applications heretofore filed in behalf of the state
or any agency thereof for the use and benefit of the state are transferred to
the board, and it is authorized to take such action thereon as it may deem
proper;
(4)  take all action necessary to acquire or perfect water rights for projects
sponsored by the board;
(5)  accept, execute and deliver deeds and all other conveyances.
